Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Shai Cooper
Act".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 7505-5.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7505-5.2. A. If a preplacement home study is not
waived by the court for good cause shown or is not required by
Section 29 7505-5.1 of this act title, the court, upon the filing of
a petition for adoption, shall order that a home study be made and
filed with the court by the designated investigator within the time
fixed by the court, and in no event more than sixty (60) days from
the issuance of the order for the home study, unless the time
therefor is extended by the court.

B. If the child to be adopted is the biological or adopted
child of either or immediate relative of the petitioners or of the
spouse of the petitioner, then the court, upon the submission of an
application, by order may waive the requirement in subsection A of
this section that a home study report be made, and the requirement
for a supplemental report set forth in subsection C of Section 31
7505-5.3 of this act title, if the court makes the following
findings:
1. That waiver of the home study requirement is in the best
interest of the child;
2. That If applicable, that the parent of the child and the
stepparent of the child, or the immediate relative of the child and
the spouse of the immediate relative who are petitioning for
adoption have been married for at least one (1) year with the child
who is to be adopted living in their home; provided, however, that
this provision shall not be construed as a prohibition against a
single, immediate relative from requesting waiver of a house study;
and
3. That the stepparent or immediate relative or spouse of the
immediate relative who is petitioning for adoption has no record of
conviction of a felony or conviction or adjudication in juvenile
court for child abuse or neglect or domestic violence, and there is
no record of a protective order or orders issued against the
stepparent or immediate relative or spouse of the immediate
relative.
In all other adoptions, including foster, relative, and
stepparent adoptions, a home study and report shall be made pursuant
to this section or Section 29 7505-5.1 of this act title.
C. For purposes of this section, immediate relative shall mean
the brother, sister, grandparent, aunt, or uncle of the child.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2647 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2647 Page 3